Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.577

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Eligible activities. (Effective until July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) Activities eligible for funding through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for eligible organizations include:

(a) Facility predesign grants or loans of no more than $20,000 to allow eligible organizations to secure professional services or consult with organizations certified by the community development financial institutions fund to plan for and assess the feasibility of early learning facilities projects or receive other technical assistance to design and develop projects for construction funding;

(b) Grants or loans of no more than $200,000 for minor renovations or repairs of existing early learning facilities or for predevelopment activities to advance a proposal from planning to major construction or renovation;

(c) Major construction and renovation grants or loans and grants or loans for facility purchases of no more than $1,000,000 to create or expand early learning facilities, except that during the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium these grants or loans may not exceed $2,500,000; and

(d) Administration costs associated with conducting application processes, managing contracts, and providing technical assistance.

(2) Activities eligible for funding through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for school districts include major construction, purchase, and renovation grants or loans of no more than $1,000,000 to create or expand early learning facilities that received priority and ranking as described in RCW 43.31.581.

(3) Amounts in this section must be increased annually by the United States implicit price deflator for state and local government construction provided by the office of financial management.

[2023 c 474 s 8031; 2021 c 130 s 1; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 8.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.

PDFRCW 43.31.577

Early learning facilities grant and loan program—Eligible activities. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1314.SL) ***

(1) Activities eligible for funding through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for eligible organizations include:

(a) Facility predesign grants or loans to allow eligible organizations to secure professional services or consult with organizations certified by the community development financial institutions fund to plan for and assess the feasibility of early learning facilities projects or receive other technical assistance to design and develop projects for construction funding;

(b) Grants or loans for predevelopment activities to advance a proposal from planning to major construction or renovation;

(c) Grants or loans for renovations or repairs of existing early learning facilities;

(d) Major construction and renovation grants or loans and grants or loans for facility purchases to create or expand early learning facilities; and

(e) Administration costs associated with conducting application processes, managing contracts, translation services, and providing technical assistance.

(2) For grants or loans awarded under subsection (1)(c) and (d) of this section, the department must prioritize applications for facilities that are ready for construction.

(3) Activities eligible for funding through the early learning facilities grant and loan program for school districts include major construction, purchase, and renovation grants or loans to create or expand early learning facilities that received priority and ranking as described in RCW 43.31.581.

[2024 c 230 s 1; 2023 c 474 s 8031; 2021 c 130 s 1; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 12 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 230 s 1: "Section 1 of this act takes effect July 1, 2025." [2024 c 230 s 5.]

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2023 c 474: See notes following RCW 28A.320.330.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 43.31.565.